Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.270

Destruction of records by county auditor or other agent.

A county auditor or other agent appointed by the director may destroy applications for vehicle registrations and any copies of vehicle registrations or other records issued after those records have been on file in the county auditor's or other agent's office for a period of eighteen months, unless otherwise directed by the director.

[ 2010 c 161 s 209; 1991 c 339 s 18; 1967 c 32 s 4; 1961 c 12 s 46.08.130. Prior: 1937 c 188 s 78; RRS s 6312-78. Formerly RCW 46.08.130.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.